Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-414
Applicability of sections.

Sections 87-411 to 87-414 shall apply to franchise agreements existing on and those executed or renewed on or after September 6, 1985.

Laws 1985, LB 700, § 4.